Connecticut, session 2026, HB05101.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That additional funds be appropriated to the Department of
Transportation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for the purposes
of increasing the frequency of the CTTransit New Haven 255 bus
between the Naugatuck Valley and the city of New Haven at certain
times.